Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.060

Corporate name of foreign corporation.

The corporate name of a foreign corporation registered in this state must comply with the provisions of RCW 23.95.525 and Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2135; 1998 c 102 s 2; 1989 c 165 s 174.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.